Utah statutes.
29-1-1.   Fireproof safe for use of guests -- Limitation of liability.
If an innkeeper, hotel keeper, boarding house or lodging house keeper keeps on
his premises a fireproof safe or vault, and gives notice to his guests,
boarders or lodgers, by posting a copy of this section in a prominent or
conspicuous place in the office of the inn, hotel, boarding house or lodging
house and in the rooms occupied by the guests, boarders or lodgers, that he
keeps for their use a fireproof safe or vault and will not be liable for
money, jewelry, documents or other articles of unusual value and small
compass, unless placed therein, he is not liable, except so far as his acts or
the acts of his employees shall contribute thereto, for any loss of or injury
to such articles, if not deposited with him to be placed in such safe or
vault, or in any case for more than the sum of $250 for any such property,
unless he shall have given a receipt in writing therefor to the guest, boarder
or lodger, and the value of the article so placed with him for safekeeping
shall have been declared by such guest, boarder or lodger.
